Florida, session 2026, SB54.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSection 406.139, Florida Statutes, is created to 29 read: 30 406.139âAutopsy of a suspected violent offender.â 31 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 32 (a)ââIntoxicating substanceâ means any alcoholic beverage, 33 controlled substance controlled under chapter 893, or chemical 34 substance set forth in s. 877.111. 35 (b)ââPsychotropic drugâ means any drug prescribed to affect 36 an individualâs mental state, including, but not limited to, 37 antidepressants, antipsychotics, mood stabilizers, and 38 antianxiety medications. 39 (c)ââViolent offenderâ means any person who is suspected by 40 law enforcement of engaging in unprovoked violence that results 41 in, or is likely to result in, the death or serious bodily 42 injury of another. 43 (2)âCONSULTATION; TOXICOLOGY SCREENING.âIf a medical 44 examinerâs office performs an autopsy on a decedent who is a 45 violent offender, the medical examiner must do all of the 46 following: 47 (a)1.âMake reasonable efforts to determine the identity of 48 any treating mental health professional or primary care 49 physician of the decedent; and 50 2.âConsult such individuals, if known and available, to 51 obtain information and records regarding the decedentâs history 52 of psychotropic drug use, including any prescribed or 53 discontinued medications. 54 (b)âOrder and perform a toxicology screening on the 55 decedent to determine whether psychotropic drugs or intoxicating 56 substances are present in the decedentâs body. 57 (3)âAUTOPSY REPORT; NOTIFICATION.â 58 (a)âAll findings under subsection (2) must be documented 59 and included in the final autopsy report, along with any 60 available corroborating information. 61 (b)1.âAny findings relating to the use of intoxicating 62 substances or psychotropic drugs must be reported to the 63 Department of Law Enforcement. 64 2.âAny findings relating to the use of psychotropic drugs 65 and, if known, the prescribing facility, must be reported to the 66 Department of Health and the Agency for Health Care 67 Administration. 68 Section 2.âPresent subsections (8) through (20) of section 69 456.057, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (9) 70 through (21), respectively, and a new subsection (8) is added to 71 that section, to read: 72 456.057âOwnership and control of patient records; report or 73 copies of records to be furnished; disclosure of information.â 74 (8)âNotwithstanding any other law, records must be 75 furnished to a law enforcement agency as defined in s. 914.28 76 upon request for the purpose of investigating a violent offender 77 as defined in s. 406.139. The release of such medical records 78 must include: 79 (a)âAny medical records that may be relevant to the mental 80 or psychological state of the suspected person. 81 (b)âAny records related to the prescription or use of 82 psychotropic drugs as defined in s. 406.139 or the prescription 83 or use of any drugs or substances that may contribute to a 84 personâs mental or psychological state. 85 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (6) of section 86 1006.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 87 1006.07âDistrict school board duties relating to student 88 discipline and school safety.âThe district school board shall 89 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the 90 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper 91 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the 92 welfare of students, including: 93 (6)âSAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.âEach district 94 school superintendent shall establish policies and procedures 95 for the prevention of violence on school grounds, including the 96 assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior 97 poses a threat to the safety of the school community. 98 (a)âSchool safety specialist.âEach district school 99 superintendent shall designate a school safety specialist for 100 the district. The school safety specialist must be a school 101 administrator employed by the school district or a law 102 enforcement officer employed by the sheriffâs office located in 103 the school district. Any school safety specialist designated 104 from the sheriffâs office must first be authorized and approved 105 by the sheriff employing the law enforcement officer. Any school 106 safety specialist designated from the sheriffâs office remains 107 the employee of the office for purposes of compensation, 108 insurance, workersâ compensation, and other benefits authorized 109 by law for a law enforcement officer employed by the sheriffâs 110 office. The sheriff and the school superintendent may determine 111 by agreement the reimbursement for such costs, or may share the 112 costs, associated with employment of the law enforcement officer 113 as a school safety specialist. The school safety specialist must 114 earn a certificate of completion of the school safety specialist 115 training provided by the Office of Safe Schools within 1 year 116 after appointment and is responsible for the supervision and 117 oversight for all school safety and security personnel, 118 policies, and procedures in the school district. The school 119 safety specialist, or his or her designee, shall: 120 1.âIn conjunction with the district school superintendent, 121 annually review school district policies and procedures for 122 compliance with state law and rules, including the districtâs 123 timely and accurate submission of school environmental safety 124 incident reports to the department pursuant to s. 1001.212(8). 125 At least quarterly, the school safety specialist must report to 126 the district school superintendent and the district school board 127 any noncompliance by the school district with laws or rules 128 regarding school safety. 129 2.âProvide the necessary training and resources to students 130 and school district staff in matters relating to youth mental 131 health awareness and assistance; emergency procedures, including 132 active shooter training; and school safety and security. 133 3.âProvide the necessary training and resources to school 134 district staff in matters relating to the adverse effects of 135 psychotropic drugs and intoxicating substances as those terms 136 are defined in s. 406.139, including the irrational, violent, or 137 suicidal behavior that may be demonstrated by students under the 138 influence of such drugs or substances. The training must include 139 instruction on how such staff can identify and safely interact 140 with students who may be under the influence of such drugs or 141 substances, including de-escalation techniques to ensure student 142 and staff safety. 143 4.âServe as the school district liaison with local public 144 safety agencies and national, state, and community agencies and 145 organizations in matters of school safety and security. 146 5.4.âIn collaboration with the appropriate public safety 147 agencies, as that term is defined in s. 365.171, by October 1 of 148 each year, conduct a school security risk assessment at each 149 public school using the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool 150 developed by the Office of Safe Schools pursuant to s. 151 1006.1493. Based on the assessment findings, the districtâs 152 school safety specialist shall provide recommendations to the 153 district school superintendent and the district school board 154 which identify strategies and activities that the district 155 school board should implement in order to address the findings 156 and improve school safety and security. Each district school 157 board must receive such findings and the school safety 158 specialistâs recommendations at a publicly noticed district 159 school board meeting to provide the public an opportunity to 160 hear the district school board members discuss and take action 161 on the findings and recommendations. Each school safety 162 specialist, through the district school superintendent, shall 163 report such findings and school board action to the Office of 164 Safe Schools within 30 days after the district school board 165 meeting. 166 6.5.âConduct annual unannounced inspections, using the form 167 adopted by the Office of Safe Schools pursuant to s. 168 1001.212(13), of all public schools, including charter schools, 169 while school is in session and investigate reports of 170 noncompliance with school safety requirements. 171 7.6.âReport violations of paragraph (f) by administrative 172 personnel and instructional personnel to the district school 173 superintendent or charter school administrator, as applicable. 174 Section 4.âSubsection (6) of section 1006.12, Florida 175 Statutes, is amended to read: 176 1006.12âSafe-school officers at each public school.âFor the 177 protection and safety of school personnel, property, students, 178 and visitors, each district school board and school district 179 superintendent shall partner with law enforcement agencies or 180 security agencies to establish or assign one or more safe-school 181 officers at each school facility within the district, including 182 charter schools. A district school board must collaborate with 183 charter school governing boards to facilitate charter school 184 access to all safe-school officer options available under this 185 section. The school district may implement any combination of 186 the options in subsections (1)-(4) to best meet the needs of the 187 school district and charter schools. 188 (6)âCRISIS INTERVENTION TRAINING; SUBSTANCE USE TRAINING.â 189 (a)âEach safe-school officer who is also a sworn law 190 enforcement officer shall complete mental health crisis 191 intervention training using a curriculum developed by a national 192 organization with expertise in mental health crisis 193 intervention. The training must improve the officerâs knowledge 194 and skills as a first responder to incidents involving students 195 with emotional disturbance or mental illness, including de 196 escalation skills to ensure student and officer safety. 197 (b)âEach safe-school officer shall complete training on the 198 adverse effects of psychotropic drugs and intoxicating 199 substances as those terms are defined in s. 406.139, including 200 the irrational, violent, or suicidal behavior that may be 201 demonstrated by students under the influence of such drugs or 202 substances. The training must include instruction on how such a 203 safe-school officer can identify and safely interact with 204 students who may be under the influence of such drugs or 205 substances, including de-escalation techniques to ensure student 206 and officer safety. 207 208 If a district school board, through its adopted policies, 209 procedures, or actions, denies a charter school access to any 210 safe-school officer options pursuant to this section, the school 211 district must assign a school resource officer or school safety 212 officer to the charter school. Under such circumstances, the 213 charter schoolâs share of the costs of the school resource 214 officer or school safety officer may not exceed the safe school 215 allocation funds provided to the charter school pursuant to s. 216 1011.62(12) and shall be retained by the school district. 217 Section 5.âParagraph (c) of subsection (7) of section 218 381.028, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 219 381.028âAdverse medical incidents.â 220 (7)âPRODUCTION OF RECORDS.â 221 (c)1.âFees charged by a health care facility for copies of 222 records requested by a patient under s. 25, Art. X of the State 223 Constitution may not exceed the reasonable and actual cost of 224 complying with the request, including a reasonable charge for 225 the staff time necessary to search for records and prevent the 226 disclosure of the identity of any patient involved in the 227 adverse medical incident through redaction or other means as 228 required by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability 229 Act of 1996 or its implementing regulations. The health care 230 facility may require payment, in full or in part, before acting 231 on the records request. 232 2.âFees charged by a health care provider for copies of 233 records requested by a patient under s. 25, Art. X of the State 234 Constitution may not exceed the amount established under s. 235 456.057(18) s. 456.057(17), which may include a reasonable 236 charge for the staff time necessary to prevent the disclosure of 237 the identity of any patient involved in the adverse medical 238 incident through redaction or other means as required by the 239 Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 or 240 its implementing regulations. The health care provider may 241 require payment, in full or in part, before acting on the 242 records request. 243 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.